Florida, session 2026, SB716.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraphs (c) and (d) are added to subsection 15 (1) of section 83.47, Florida Statutes, to read: 16 83.47âProhibited provisions in rental agreements.â 17 (1)âA provision in a rental agreement is void and 18 unenforceable to the extent that it: 19 (c)âImposes any fee or surcharge during the 5-day period 20 for paying rent as required under s. 83.56(3). 21 (d)âImposes a period of time, regardless of the phrase 22 used, in which a tenant must pay an additional fee each rental 23 period for a specified duration because the tenant missed a rent 24 payment or was late in paying rent. 25 Section 2.âSubsection (3) and paragraph (a) of subsection 26 (5) of section 83.56, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 27 83.56âTermination of rental agreement.â 28 (3)âIf the tenant fails to pay rent when due and the 29 default continues for 5 3 days, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and 30 legal holidays, after delivery of written demand by the landlord 31 for payment of the rent or possession of the premises, the 32 landlord may terminate the rental agreement. Legal holidays for 33 the purpose of this section are shall be court-observed holidays 34 only. The landlord may not impose any fee or surcharge during 35 the 5-day period. The 5-day 3-day notice must shall contain a 36 statement in substantially the following form: 37 38 You are hereby notified that you are indebted to me in 39 the sum of .... dollars for the rent and use of the 40 premises ...(address of leased premises, including 41 county)..., Florida, now occupied by you and that I 42 demand payment of the rent or possession of the 43 premises within 5 3 days (excluding Saturday, Sunday, 44 and legal holidays) after from the date of delivery of 45 this notice, to wit: on or before the .... day of 46 ...., ...(year).... 47 ...(landlordâs name, address and phone number)... 48 49 (5)(a)âIf the landlord accepts rent with actual knowledge 50 of a noncompliance by the tenant or accepts performance by the 51 tenant of any other provision of the rental agreement that is at 52 variance with its provisions, or if the tenant pays rent with 53 actual knowledge of a noncompliance by the landlord or accepts 54 performance by the landlord of any other provision of the rental 55 agreement that is at variance with its provisions, the landlord 56 or tenant waives his or her right to terminate the rental 57 agreement or to bring a civil action for that noncompliance, but 58 not for any subsequent or continuing noncompliance. However, a 59 landlord does not waive the right to terminate the rental 60 agreement or to bring a civil action for that noncompliance by 61 accepting partial rent for the period. If partial rent is 62 accepted after posting the notice for nonpayment, the landlord 63 must: 64 1.âProvide the tenant with a receipt stating the date and 65 amount received and the agreed upon date and balance of rent due 66 before filing an action for possession; 67 2.âPlace the amount of partial rent accepted from the 68 tenant in the registry of the court upon filing the action for 69 possession; or 70 3.âPost a new 5-day 3-day notice reflecting the new amount 71 due. 72 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 83.60, Florida 73 Statutes, is amended to read: 74 83.60âDefenses to action for rent or possession; 75 procedure.â 76 (2)âIn an action by the landlord for possession of a 77 dwelling unit, if the tenant interposes any defense other than 78 payment, including, but not limited to, the defense of a 79 defective 5-day 3-day notice, the tenant shall pay into the 80 registry of the court the accrued rent as alleged in the 81 complaint or as determined by the court and the rent that 82 accrues during the pendency of the proceeding, when due. The 83 clerk shall notify the tenant of such requirement in the 84 summons. Failure of the tenant to pay the rent into the registry 85 of the court or to file a motion to determine the amount of rent 86 to be paid into the registry within 5 days, excluding Saturdays, 87 Sundays, and legal holidays, after the date of service of 88 process constitutes an absolute waiver of the tenantâs defenses 89 other than payment, and the landlord is entitled to an immediate 90 default judgment for removal of the tenant with a writ of 91 possession to issue without further notice or hearing thereon. 92 If a motion to determine rent is filed, documentation in support 93 of the allegation that the rent as alleged in the complaint is 94 in error is required. Public housing tenants or tenants 95 receiving rent subsidies are required to deposit only that 96 portion of the full rent for which they are responsible pursuant 97 to the federal, state, or local program in which they are 98 participating. 99 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.